Oklahoma, session 2025, SB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-1925.2A of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Health Care Authority in its annual budget
request submitted pursuant to Section 34.36 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes shall include a supplemental item reflecting the
new state and federal funding necessary to meet the additional costs
associated with reimbursing nursing facilities and intermediate care
facilities for individuals with intellectual disabilities at the
most recent audited cost.
B. Audited cost shall be calculated by using the latest cost
report submitted to the Oklahoma Health Care Authority.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 253 Page 2